Connecticut, session 2026, SB00216.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 3-24k of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) The State Treasurer may establish a program under which the
State Treasurer may, based on cash availability, make available a pool
of funds not exceeding three hundred million dollars for investment
with eligible community banks and community credit unions. Such
funds shall be obtained from the state's operating cash managed by the
State Treasurer.
(b) (1) The State Treasurer shall establish eligibility criteria for any
program established under subsection (a) of this section. Such eligibility
criteria shall include, at a minimum, an asset limit for community banks
and community credit unions to participate in such program. Such asset
SB216 / File No. 120 1

SB216 File No. 120
limit shall provide that: (A) During the period beginning July 1, 2023,
and ending September 29, 2024, no community bank or community
credit union with assets exceeding two billion dollars may participate in
such program; and (B) beginning September 30, 2024, no community
bank or community credit union may participate in such program if
such community bank's or community credit union's assets exceed the
sum of (i) the preceding asset limit established by the State Treasurer,
and (ii) the median percentage loan growth of community banks and
community credit unions eligible for the program at the time when the
State Treasurer establishes such asset limit. As used in this subsection,
"median percentage loan growth" means the middle value representing
the percentage increase or decrease, as the case may be, in loan assets
over a period of time reflected on the balance sheet of a specified group
of lenders.
(2) Not later than July 1, 2024, and annually thereafter, the State
Treasurer shall provide to the Department of Banking a list of the
community banks and community credit unions that are eligible to
participate in such program at the time when the State Treasurer
provides each such list to the department. Not later than August 31,
2024, and annually thereafter, the Department of Banking shall provide
to the State Treasurer the median percentage loan growth of each such
community bank and community credit union.
(c) The State Treasurer shall establish a schedule for making such
investments with such banks and credit unions.
(d) The State Treasurer shall establish a [competitive bidding]
procedure under which such banks and credit unions may [compete]
apply for investment-related services under said program. Under such
procedure, the State Treasurer may accept rates for such investment-
related services that are not greater than one hundred basis points below
the previous day's yield for an appropriately comparative United States
Treasury security with the same maturity date as the maturity date
applicable to such investment-related services, as determined by the
State Treasurer.
SB216 / File No. 120 2

SB216 File No. 120
(e) The State Treasurer may establish capital standards for such banks
and credit unions wishing to participate in said program.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 3-24k
BA Joint Favorable
SB216 / File No. 120 3

SB216 File No. 120
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Various Various - See Below See Below
Uncertain
Note: Various=Various
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill allows the Treasurer to accept lower investment return rates
as part of the Community Bank and Community Credit Union
programs, instead of using the competitive bid process under current
law. The impact of this change is uncertain, as it will depend on the
amount and timing of investment received from offerings under the
new system versus the current, as well as any difference between
investment returns generated by these programs compared to other
short term cash flow investments. Any impacts would be to various
funds that are invested within the short-term investment markets.
The Out Years
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
continue into the future subject to the terms and results of short term
investment.
SB216 / File No. 120 4

SB216 File No. 120
OLR Bill Analysis
SB 216
AN ACT CONCERNING THE COMMUNITY BANK AND CREDIT
UNION INVESTMENT PROGRAM ESTABLISHED BY THE STATE
TREASURER.